__1st_try_roman_lexica__/postp.lexc
!!!postp.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Postp

LEXICON Root
Postp;

LEXICON PostpInf
+Postp:0 #;

LEXICON Postp
!Lexical items from corpus
drbare	PostpInf;
ra	PostpInf;
emrae	PostpInf;
myan	PostpInf;
knar	PostpInf;
w	PostpInf;
jlwy	PostpInf;
az	PostpInf;
ħdwd	PostpInf;
dr	PostpInf;
ra	PostpInf;
pyš	PostpInf;
rw	PostpInf;
